DI-843

DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

DI3IW-03

DTC

B1272 /72 Power seat ECU communication stop
(w/ Seat memory vehicle only)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This DTC is output when communication stops between power seat ECU and Body No.1 ECU.

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

B1272/72 No communication from seat ECU more than 10 seconds.

* Power seat ECU
*Wireharness

WIRING DIAGRAM

See page DI-836.

INSPECTION

PROCEDURE

1 Check powerseat ECU.

CHECK:

Check that the operation of front vertical and rear vertical is normal.

HINT:

With this inspection, the power seat ECU CPU can be diagnosed if it works normally or not.
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Replace the power seat ECU.
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2 Check wireharness
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PREPARATION:

Disconnect connector body ECU, power seat ECU and tilt &

telescopic ECU.

CHECK:

(@) Check continuity betweenterminalsMPX 1 ofbody ECU
and MPX2 of power seat ECU.

(b) Check continuity betweenterminalsMPX 1 of power seat
ECU and MPX2 of tilt & telescopic ECU.

OK:

There is a continuity in wireharness.

NG> Repair or replace wireharness.

Replace power seat ECU.
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